Mississippi statutes. Title 51. Waters, Water Resources, Water Districts, Drainage, and Flood Control
Pearl River Basin Development District; dissolution

§
51-11-101.
Dissolution; Department of Finance and Administration to be agent-in-fact for district; settlement of outstanding operating accounts; contracts with former employees; disposal of district personalty or equipment.

On July 1, 2018, the Pearl River Basin Development District (the “district”) is dissolved, and all statutory authority granted to the district under Sections 51-11-1 through 51-11-87 is repealed as provided in Section 5 of Chapter 356, Laws of 2018.

Through June 30, 2018, the district is authorized to continue to conduct such business as is necessary to settle any accounts and/or financial obligations of the district.

From and after July 1, 2018, the Department of Finance and Administration (the “department”) shall be the agent-in-fact for the district for all purposes, and notwithstanding the repeal of the statutory authority of the district, the department shall have all of the authority that was granted to the district under Sections 51-11-1 through 51-11-87 as they existed on June 30, 2018, to the extent necessary and for as long as necessary for the department to complete the dissolution of the district and ensure that all obligations of the district are met.

From and after July 1, 2018, the department is authorized to settle any outstanding operating accounts of the district, and the department shall have the use of all funds that were available to the district before July 1, 2018, in the State Treasury or in any approved depository, together with any net proceeds derived from the sale of any property of the district, in order to fulfill the district’s outstanding financial obligations. Those funds may be expended by the department upon appropriation by the Legislature, and shall not lapse into the State General Fund at the end of any fiscal year. However, if there are any of those funds remaining after all expenditures relating to the dissolution of the district have been made, the department shall deposit the remaining funds into the State General Fund. The department shall maintain accurate records of all accounts and disbursals of those funds and shall periodically share those records with the Legislative Budget Office and the Office of the State Auditor as a part of any close-out audit.

From any funds that were formerly available to the district as described in subsection (4) of this section or any funds appropriated to the department specifically for this purpose, the department is authorized, in any fiscal year, to engage on a contract basis the services of any former employee or contract employee of the district to the extent that the State Fiscal Officer deems such a contract to be beneficial to the administration of dissolution of the district and the performance of the department’s obligations under Sections 51-11-101 through 51-11-107.

From and after July 1, 2018, the department is authorized to dispose of any personalty or equipment of the district as surplus property or through inventory transfer to another public entity, and is authorized to settle any existing lease or leases of the district, either by canceling, assigning or subleasing the same. For the vehicles of the district, the department may transfer any of the vehicles to other state agencies without any payment being required from the agency, or may sell any of the vehicles for such price as determined by the State Fiscal Officer, and shall deposit all funds received from the sale of the vehicles into the funds in the State Treasury that were formerly available to the district, as described in subsection (4) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 2018).

§
51-11-103.
Transfer of real property to county in which property is located; receiving county's assumption of duties and obligations appurtenant to property; finding that property is surplus; liability for financial obligations occurring or accruing before dissolution continues after dissolution.

Through June 30, 2018, the district, and from and after July 1, 2018, the department, is authorized to transfer any real property to which the district currently holds or formerly held title, specifically including, but not limited to, any water parks or similar facilities owned by the district, to the county or municipality in which the real property lies. As consideration for the property being received, the county or municipality must agree to accept the transfer and any duties and obligations appurtenant to the property. Any equipment associated with a water park or other real property of the district that is transferred under this subsection shall also be transferred to the county or municipality that accepts the transfer of the real property.

Any county or municipality accepting the transfer of a water park or other real property from the district or the department is authorized to assume any duties and obligations appurtenant to the property as formerly exercised by the district, including, but not limited to, the obligation to operate and maintain those properties out of the revenues of the county or municipality, the obligation to protect the property with either liability insurance or through the Mississippi Tort Claims Fund, and the assumption and/or transfer of any obligations as a recipient or sponsor of any state or federal grant or grant funds.

Any county that chooses not to accept the transfer of any real property currently or formerly owned by the district, after determining that no municipality in the county wishes to have the property transferred to it, may make a finding that the property would be surplus to the needs of the county, by proper action and order of the board of supervisors of the county. Upon the making of a finding that a property would be surplus to the needs of the county, the Secretary of State may institute proceedings to sell the surplus property in accordance with Section 29-1-1, in accordance with the process described in Section 29-1-37, or in accordance with other applicable statutes. The Secretary of State may deduct the costs of effecting the sale of the surplus property from the net proceeds of the sale before transferring the funds as authorized in Sections 51-11-101 through 51-11-107. Proceeds from the sale of any such property shall, where applicable, be used for the acquisition of additional properties by the state, acting by and through the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, to satisfy any obligations imposed by grants as to the nature and use of the property.

The liability of a county for any financial obligations or indebtedness to the district occurring or accruing before the dissolution of the district, including, but not limited to, the responsibility for paying its portion of any district bonds and other contractual obligations, and making annual payments to the district as set forth in Section 51-11-31, shall continue in existence after the district is dissolved and shall be payable by the county to the department. The department is authorized to take such actions as necessary to collect any financial obligations of a county to the district that are still outstanding after the district is dissolved.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 2018).

§
51-11-105.
Contingent continuation of existing Lower Pearl River Restoration Project agreements; funding of necessary maintenance activities; Lower Pearl River Restoration Trust Fund.

The following provisions related to the Lower Pearl River Restoration Project (“project”) are contingent upon the development of an agreement, or an amendment to the existing agreement, between the United States Army, Corps of Engineers (“USACOE”), the Mississippi Department of Environmental Quality (“MDEQ”), the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks (“DWFP”) and the district, removing the district from the agreement, and possibly adding a new cooperating partner or partners and possibly removing the MDEQ and/or the DWFP from the agreement.

From and after July 1, 2018, the project, currently being managed as a joint effort of the USACOE, the MDEQ, the DWFP, and the district, shall continue as per existing agreements, which may be amended to reflect the dissolution of the district and its removal from those agreements. The obligations of the district under the current agreements for the project may be assumed by the MDEQ, or other entity, as the designated state entity for the continuing obligation of maintenance of the water control structures as set forth in the original agreements. The parties to the agreement may identify necessary maintenance activities needed to preserve the integrity of project structures and other ordinary maintenance activities as the parties may agree need to be performed. Funding to perform those maintenance activities shall come from the Lower Pearl trust account currently on deposit with a depository or depositories in the name of the Pearl River Basin Development District, which funds are a special fund set aside solely for the operation and maintenance of the project. From and after July 1, 2018, the parties to the agreement, may assume ownership, in trust, of those funds, and the funds shall be known as the “Lower Pearl River Restoration Trust Fund.” Monies from this fund shall be a special fund set aside for the purpose(s) set forth in the amended or reformed agreement between the parties and shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and may not be expended for any purpose other than operation and maintenance activities under the purview of the project.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 2018).

§
51-11-107.
Final close-out audit of district accounts.

The State Auditor shall perform or have performed a final close-out audit of the accounts of the district. The close-out audit shall be in a form acceptable to the State Auditor and may be conducted in lieu of the usual annual audit of accounts, if the district had continued in existence. Costs of conducting the close-out audit may be defrayed from any funds formerly under the control of the district and currently under the control of the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2018, ch. 356, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 15, 2018).